Tennessee statutes. Title 69 Waters, Waterways, Drains And Levees
Part 2

Inter-basin Water Transfers

69-7-201. Short title.

This part shall be known as the “Inter-basin Water Transfer Act.”

Acts 2000, ch. 854, § 2; T.C.A. §69-8-201.

69-7-202. Legislative findings — Purpose.

The general assembly finds that as the population and demand for water resources grow, it is prudent to engage in planning for the future and to have an explicit mechanism in place to regulate proposals for the diversion of water from one river basin to another. By removing water from rivers, such inter-basin transfers raise issues of the protection of the public health, safety, welfare and the environment as the water is no longer available for use in the original stream. The primary purpose of this part is to allow regulation on the basis of the quantity of water in river basins. Although the common law addresses some of these concerns, it relies on after-the-fact litigation rather than a modern regulatory system. As this is remedial and police power legislation, all sections of this part shall be liberally construed to effectuate its purpose.

Acts 2000, ch. 854, § 3; T.C.A. §69-8-202.

69-7-203. Definition of basin and river basin.

For purposes of this part, “basin” or “river basin” refers to the entire topographic extent of the following ten (10) watersheds and combinations of watersheds:

The Mississippi River and all of its tributaries west of the Tennessee River Valley;

The Duck River, the Elk River, and the western Tennessee River Valley;

The lower Cumberland River to the downstream point of the mouth of the Caney Fork River, the Harpeth and the Stones rivers;

The tributaries of the Barren River;

The upper Cumberland River, the Caney Fork, the Obed, and the Big South Fork of the Cumberland River;

The lower Tennessee River in East Tennessee up to and including the Hiawassee River;

The Conasauga River;

The Upper Tennessee River in East Tennessee upstream of the Hiawassee, the Little Tennessee, the Clinch, and the Emory rivers;

The French Broad River and the Nolichuckey River; and

The Holston River and the Watauga River.

Acts 2000, ch. 854, § 4; T.C.A. §69-8-203.

69-7-204. Acquisition of permit — Determination of amount of existing inter-basin transfer.

All persons or entities:

That have been granted powers by the state to acquire water, water rights and associated property by eminent domain or condemnation; or

That acquire or supply water for the use or benefit of public water supply systems as defined in § 68-221-703,

shall, when proposing a new or increased withdrawal of surface water or ground water for the purpose of transferring or diverting, or both, some or all of it out of a river basin either directly or through one (1) or more intermediaries, first apply for and obtain a permit from the commissioner of environment and conservation, or the commissioner's designee, prior to such diversion or transfer; provided, that in the case of ground water withdrawal, this section shall only apply if the loss of the ground water has a significant potential to adversely affect the flow of a Tennessee surface water.

For purposes of determining the amount of an existing inter-basin transfer under this section, it is the average daily amount calculated for the highest continuous 90-day period between January 1, 1997, and December 31, 1999; provided, that nothing whatsoever in this section shall apply to existing withdrawals by entities described above except that such persons or entities shall be subject to this section when proposing to:

Increase the amount of water withdrawn, when some or all of the water will be transferred to a different river basin; or

Locate a new intake for withdrawal, when some or all of the water will be transferred to a different river basin.

All persons or entities that are issued a permit under subsection (a) shall operate the withdrawal activity in accordance with all terms and conditions of the permit.

Acts 2000, ch. 854, § 5; T.C.A. §69-8-204.

69-7-205. Powers of commissioner of environment and conservation.

In addition to powers under all other statutes, including, but not limited to, the Water Quality Control Act, compiled in chapter 3, part 1 of this title, and the Safe Drinking Water Act, compiled in title 68, chapter 221, part 7, the commissioner of environment and conservation, or the commissioner's designee, shall have the following powers and duties under this part:

To issue and to deny inter-basin transfer permits in accordance with § 69-7-206;

To issue civil penalty assessments in accordance with § 69-7-208;

To conduct inspections and investigations;

To bring suit in the name of the department for any violation of this part, including seeking any remedy available under this part as well as under any other statutory or common law remedy related to water availability and supply;

To require the submission of plans, specifications, technical reports, and any other information the commissioner deems necessary to carry out this part;

To delegate any of the commissioner's duties to the director of the appropriate division under the commissioner's supervision; and

To be the primary administrative agent in carrying out this part.

Acts 2000, ch. 854, § 6; T.C.A. §69-8-205.

69-7-206. Issuance and denial of permit. [Current version. See second version of section and its Compiler’s Notes.]

The commissioner shall issue or deny any permit applied for pursuant to § 69-7-204 in accordance with this part and the rules adopted by the board of water quality, oil and gas under § 69-7-207 and any applicable provisions of the Water Quality Control Act, compiled in chapter 3, part 1 of this title, and rules under that act. Such permits shall be issued for a renewal term of five (5) years and contain necessary and appropriate conditions to accomplish the purposes of the same part and rules.

The commissioner shall, to the maximum extent feasible, combine the permit application and issuance processes for a withdrawal activity that requires permits under this part and the Water Quality Control Act.

The commissioner may revoke, suspend, or modify any permit for the following reasons:

A violation of any terms or conditions of the permit or of any provision of this part;

Obtaining the permit by misrepresentation or failing to disclose fully all relevant facts; or

A change in any condition that requires either a temporary or permanent reduction or elimination of the permitted inter-basin transfer because of reasonably likely adverse impacts to downstream users or the environment.

Any person aggrieved by the issuance or denial of a permit by the commissioner under this part may appeal such matter to the board of water quality, oil and gas solely in accordance with § 69-7-207(3).

Acts 2000, ch. 854, § 7; T.C.A. §69-8-206; Acts 2005, ch. 325, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2005, ch. 325, § 3 provided that the amendment of subsection (d) shall only apply to permit applications filed after June 7, 2005.

Acts 2012, ch. 986, §§ 26-28 amended §69-3-104 to substitute “board of water quality, oil and gas” for “board of water quality control”.

69-7-206. Issuance and denial of permit. [Contingent amendment. See first version of section and Compiler’s Notes.]

The commissioner shall issue or deny any permit applied for pursuant to § 69-7-204 in accordance with this part and the rules adopted by the board of energy and natural resources under § 69-7-207 and any applicable provisions of the Water Quality Control Act, compiled in chapter 3, part 1 of this title, and rules under that act. Such permits shall be issued for a renewal term of five (5) years and contain necessary and appropriate conditions to accomplish the purposes of the same part and rules.

The commissioner shall, to the maximum extent feasible, combine the permit application and issuance processes for a withdrawal activity that requires permits under this part and the Water Quality Control Act.

The commissioner may revoke, suspend, or modify any permit for the following reasons:

A violation of any terms or conditions of the permit or of any provision of this part;

Obtaining the permit by misrepresentation or failing to disclose fully all relevant facts; or

A change in any condition that requires either a temporary or permanent reduction or elimination of the permitted inter-basin transfer because of reasonably likely adverse impacts to downstream users or the environment.

Any person aggrieved by the issuance or denial of a permit by the commissioner under this part may appeal such matter to the board of energy and natural resources solely in accordance with § 69-7-207(3).

Acts 2000, ch. 854, § 7; T.C.A. §69-8-206; Acts 2005, ch. 325, § 1; 2018, ch. 839, §§ 35, 36.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2005, ch. 325, § 3 provided that the amendment of subsection (d) shall only apply to permit applications filed after June 7, 2005.

Acts 2012, ch. 986, §§ 26-28 amended §69-3-104 to substitute “board of water quality, oil and gas” for “board of water quality control”.

Acts 2018, ch. 839, § 44 provided that the governor shall take all action necessary to prepare and submit for approval all necessary requests for federal grant funding and applications for authorization to the appropriate federal authority to obtain exclusive jurisdiction over surface coal mining and reclamation operations and the maximum federal money available for those purposes in an expeditious manner.

Acts 2018, ch. 839, § 45 provided that the commissioner of environment and conservation shall notify the secretary of state and the executive secretary of the Tennessee code commission of the date this state has been approved to exercise primacy over the regulation of surface coal mining and reclamation operations within its territorial boundaries.

Acts 2018, ch. 839, § 47 provided that the act, which amended this section, shall take effect, including for purposes of rulemaking, upon the deposit of federal funds in the Coal Mining Protection Fund.

Amendments. The 2018 amendment substituted “board of energy and natural resources” for “board of water quality, oil and gas” in the first sentence in (a) and in (d).

Effective Dates. Acts 2018, ch. 839, § 47. [Contingent. See Compiler’s Notes.]

69-7-207. Duties and powers of board of water quality, oil and gas.
[Current version. See second version of section and its Compiler’s Notes.]

In addition to powers under all other statutes, including, but not limited to, the Water Quality Control Act, compiled in chapter 3, part 1 of this title, and the Safe Drinking Water Act, compiled in title 68, chapter 221, part 7, the board of water quality, oil and gas, created by §69-3-104, has the following powers and duties under this part:

To promulgate rules to be effective by October 1, 2000, to effectuate the purposes of this part including, but not limited to:

Defining necessary terms;

Setting criteria for permit issuance and denial as well as for permit conditions, taking into account all appropriate factors including, but not limited to, existing uses downstream of a proposed withdrawal, low flow conditions, classified uses of the stream under the Water Quality Control Act, climatic conditions, alternatives to the proposed withdrawal, the number of downstream river miles from which water will be diverted as a result of the transfer, quantity of a proposed withdrawal, and quantity and location of water returned;

Establishing procedures for permit issuance, including application fees for permits under this part, categories of withdrawals for which general permits would be appropriate, requirements for public notice, including notice to potentially affected communities and water users and notice to the public of receipt of a permit application within thirty (30) days of receipt, and opportunity for public comment and public hearings;

To hear appeals from assessments of civil penalty assessments; and

To hold a contested case hearing concerning the commissioner's issuance or denial of a permit, upon receiving a petition for permit appeal. During this hearing, the board shall review the commissioner's permit decision and may reverse or modify the decision upon finding that it does not comply with any provisions of this part. A petition for permit appeal may be filed pursuant to this subdivision (3) by the permit applicant, or by any aggrieved person who participated in the public comment period or gave testimony at a formal public hearing, whose appeal is based upon any of the issues that were provided to the commissioner in writing during the public comment period or in testimony at a formal public hearing on the permit application. Any petition for permit appeal under this subdivision (3) shall be filed with the board within thirty (30) days after public notice of the commissioner's decision to issue or deny the permit. Notwithstanding §§ 4-5-223 or 69-3-118(a), or any other law to the contrary, this subdivision (3) shall be the exclusive means for obtaining administrative review of the commissioner's issuance or denial of a permit.

Acts 2000, ch. 854, § 8; T.C.A. §69-8-207; Acts 2005, ch. 325, § 2.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2005, ch. 325, § 3 provided that the amendment of subdivision (3) shall only apply to permit applications filed after June 7, 2005.

Acts 2012, ch. 986, §§ 26-28 amended §69-3-104 to substitute “board of water quality, oil and gas” for “board of water quality control”.

69-7-207. Duties and powers of board of energy and natural resources.
[Contingent amendment. See first version of section and Compiler’s Notes.]

In addition to powers under all other statutes, including, but not limited to, the Water Quality Control Act, compiled in chapter 3, part 1 of this title, and the Safe Drinking Water Act, compiled in title 68, chapter 221, part 7, the board of energy and natural resources, created by §69-3-104, has the following powers and duties under this part:

To promulgate rules to be effective by October 1, 2000, to effectuate the purposes of this part including, but not limited to:

Defining necessary terms;

Setting criteria for permit issuance and denial as well as for permit conditions, taking into account all appropriate factors including, but not limited to, existing uses downstream of a proposed withdrawal, low flow conditions, classified uses of the stream under the Water Quality Control Act, climatic conditions, alternatives to the proposed withdrawal, the number of downstream river miles from which water will be diverted as a result of the transfer, quantity of a proposed withdrawal, and quantity and location of water returned;

Establishing procedures for permit issuance, including application fees for permits under this part, categories of withdrawals for which general permits would be appropriate, requirements for public notice, including notice to potentially affected communities and water users and notice to the public of receipt of a permit application within thirty (30) days of receipt, and opportunity for public comment and public hearings;

To hear appeals from assessments of civil penalty assessments; and

To hold a contested case hearing concerning the commissioner's issuance or denial of a permit, upon receiving a petition for permit appeal. During this hearing, the board shall review the commissioner's permit decision and may reverse or modify the decision upon finding that it does not comply with any provisions of this part. A petition for permit appeal may be filed pursuant to this subdivision (3) by the permit applicant, or by any aggrieved person who participated in the public comment period or gave testimony at a formal public hearing, whose appeal is based upon any of the issues that were provided to the commissioner in writing during the public comment period or in testimony at a formal public hearing on the permit application. Any petition for permit appeal under this subdivision (3) shall be filed with the board within thirty (30) days after public notice of the commissioner's decision to issue or deny the permit. Notwithstanding §§ 4-5-223 or 69-3-118(a), or any other law to the contrary, this subdivision (3) shall be the exclusive means for obtaining administrative review of the commissioner's issuance or denial of a permit.

Acts 2000, ch. 854, § 8; T.C.A. §69-8-207; Acts 2005, ch. 325, § 2; 2018, ch. 839, § 37.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2005, ch. 325, § 3 provided that the amendment of subdivision (3) shall only apply to permit applications filed after June 7, 2005.

Acts 2012, ch. 986, §§ 26-28 amended §69-3-104 to substitute “board of water quality, oil and gas” for “board of water quality control”.

Acts 2018, ch. 839, § 44 provided that the governor shall take all action necessary to prepare and submit for approval all necessary requests for federal grant funding and applications for authorization to the appropriate federal authority to obtain exclusive jurisdiction over surface coal mining and reclamation operations and the maximum federal money available for those purposes in an expeditious manner.

Acts 2018, ch. 839, § 45 provided that the commissioner of environment and conservation shall notify the secretary of state and the executive secretary of the Tennessee code commission of the date this state has been approved to exercise primacy over the regulation of surface coal mining and reclamation operations within its territorial boundaries.

Acts 2018, ch. 839, § 47 provided that the act, which amended this section, shall take effect, including for purposes of rulemaking, upon the deposit of federal funds in the Coal Mining Protection Fund.

Amendments. The 2018 amendment substituted “board of energy and natural resources, created by §69-3-104” for “board of water quality, oil and gas, created by §69-3-104” in the introductory language.

Effective Dates. Acts 2018, ch. 839, § 47. [Contingent. See Compiler’s Notes.]

69-7-208. Assessment of civil penalties.

The commissioner may assess civil penalties for any violation of this part of up to ten thousand dollars ($10,000) per day per violation. In making such assessments, the commissioner shall consider all appropriate factors including, without limitation, whether the violation was knowing or intentional, any actual harm to people or the environment resulting from the violation or activity, the potential for harm to people or the environment posed by the violation or activity.

Any civil penalty shall be assessed in the following manner:

The commissioner may issue an assessment against any person or entity responsible for the violation; and

Any person or entity against whom an assessment has been issued may secure a review of such assessment by filing with the commissioner a written petition setting forth the grounds and reasons for the objections, and asking for a hearing on the matter involved before the board. If a petition for review of the assessment is not filed within thirty (30) days after the date the assessment is served, the violator shall be deemed to have consented to the assessment and it shall become final.

All fees and penalties assessed and collected under this part shall be administered in the same manner as provided in the Environmental Protection Fund, compiled at title 68, chapter 203.

Acts 2000, ch. 854, § 9; T.C.A. §69-8-208.

69-7-209. Exercise of grants of power.

Any exercise of the state's grants of power to acquire water, water rights, and associated property by eminent domain or condemnation, and for the use or benefit of public water supply, shall not be made in a manner that conflicts with the Water Quality Control Act, compiled in chapter 3, part 1 of this title, or this part and the regulations under this part.

Acts 2000, ch. 854, § 10; T.C.A. §69-8-209.

69-7-210. Designation of protected areas.
[Current version. See second version of section and its Compiler’s Notes.]

The board of water quality, oil and gas may, from time to time after giving due notice and conducting a public hearing, determine and delineate such basins or portions of basins where the demands upon supply made by water users have developed or threaten to develop to such a degree as to create a water shortage and any such areas may be designated as “protected areas.” The water quality control board, whenever it determines that such shortage no longer exists, shall terminate the protected status of such area and shall give public notice of such termination.

Acts 2000, ch. 854, § 12; T.C.A. §69-8-210.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2012, ch. 986, §§ 26-28 amended §69-3-104 to substitute “board of water quality, oil and gas” for “board of water quality control”.

69-7-210. Designation of protected areas.
[Contingent amendment. See first version of section and Compiler’s Notes.]

The board of energy and natural resources may, from time to time after giving due notice and conducting a public hearing, determine and delineate such basins or portions of basins where the demands upon supply made by water users have developed or threaten to develop to such a degree as to create a water shortage and any such areas may be designated as “protected areas.” The board of energy and natural resources, whenever it determines that such shortage no longer exists, shall terminate the protected status of such area and shall give public notice of such termination.

Acts 2000, ch. 854, § 12; T.C.A. §69-8-210; Acts 2018, ch. 839, § 38.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2012, ch. 986, §§ 26-28 amended §69-3-104 to substitute “board of water quality, oil and gas” for “board of water quality control”.

Acts 2018, ch. 839, § 44 provided that the governor shall take all action necessary to prepare and submit for approval all necessary requests for federal grant funding and applications for authorization to the appropriate federal authority to obtain exclusive jurisdiction over surface coal mining and reclamation operations and the maximum federal money available for those purposes in an expeditious manner.

Acts 2018, ch. 839, § 45 provided that the commissioner of environment and conservation shall notify the secretary of state and the executive secretary of the Tennessee code commission of the date this state has been approved to exercise primacy over the regulation of surface coal mining and reclamation operations within its territorial boundaries.

Acts 2018, ch. 839, § 47 provided that the act, which amended this section, shall take effect, including for purposes of rulemaking, upon the deposit of federal funds in the Coal Mining Protection Fund.

Amendments. The 2018 amendment substituted “board of energy and natural resources” for “board of water quality, oil and gas” and “water quality control board” wherever it appeared.

Effective Dates. Acts 2018, ch. 839, § 47. [Contingent. See Compiler’s Notes.]

69-7-211. Submission of documents and records to commissioner of environment and conservation.

Prior to October 1, 2000, all persons or entities subject to § 69-7-204(a) that operate an existing inter-basin transfer shall submit flow or pumping records or other documentation that shows to the commissioner of environment and conservation's satisfaction the amount of such transfer. The commissioner shall respond in writing stating whether the documentation was sufficient or specifying any deficiency that shall promptly be corrected. Any failure to comply with this section will constitute a violation of this part.

All such persons or entities shall, thereafter, either submit every October 1 a statement under oath certifying that there has been no increase in the inter-basin transfer, together with appropriate documentation, or a timely permit application for any increased inter-basin transfer as provided in § 69-7-204.

Acts 2000, ch. 854, § 13; T.C.A. §69-8-211.

69-7-212. Redesignation of personnel.

The department of environment and conservation may redesignate existing personnel to implement this chapter.

Acts 2000, ch. 854, §§ 14, 15; T.C.A. §69-8-212.

Code Commission Notes.

Former subsection (b), concerning the deadline for a report regarding implementation of this part, was deleted as obsolete by the code commission in 2012.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2012, ch. 604, § 20 purported to amend subsection (b). Subsection (b) was deleted as obsolete by the code commission in 2012; therefore, the amendment was not given effect.